Washington statutes.
RCW 3.70.040

Duties.

The Washington state district and municipal court judges' association shall:

(1) Continuously survey and study the operation of the courts served by its membership, the volume and condition of business of such courts, the methods of procedure therein, the work accomplished, and the character of the results;

(2) Promulgate suggested rules for the administration of the courts of limited jurisdiction not inconsistent with the law or rules of the supreme court relating to such courts;

(3) Report annually to the supreme court as well as the governor and the legislature on the condition of business in the courts of limited jurisdiction, including the association's recommendations as to needed changes in the organization, operation, judicial procedure, and laws or statutes implemented or enforced in these courts.

[ 1994 c 32 s 5; 1984 c 258 s 53; 1980 c 162 s 10; 1961 c 299 s 126.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Severability—1980 c 162: See note following RCW 3.02.010.